Illinois, session 104th, SB1564.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-80 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-80 new)7    Sec. 10-80. Administration of the Illinois Developmental 8Disabilities Services Scratch-Off Fund. The Department of 9Human Services shall administer the Illinois Developmental 10Disabilities Services Scratch-off Fund. The Department shall 11pass all of the moneys deposited in the Fund as grants for 12services provided by the Independent Service Coordination 13agencies as defined in Section 10 of the Disabilities Services 14Act of 2003. 15    Section 10. The Illinois Lottery Law is amended by 16changing Sections 9.3 and 20 and by adding Section 21.18 as 17follows: 18    (20 ILCS 1605/9.3)19    Sec. 9.3. Expenditure and distribution of lottery 20proceeds.21    (a) Beginning July 1, 2022, except as provided in Sections   SB1564- 2 -LRB104 08185 LNS 18235 b121.4, 21.5, 21.6, 21.7, 21.8, 21.9, 21.10, 21.11, 21.13, 221.15, and 21.16, and 21.18 of this Law and Section 25-70 of 3the Sports Wagering Act, the Department shall distribute all 4proceeds of lottery tickets and shares sold in the following 5priority and manner:6        (1) The payment of prizes and retailer bonuses.7        (2) The payment of costs incurred in the operation and 8    administration of the Lottery, including the payment of 9    sums due to the private manager under the management 10    agreement with the Department and including costs of 11    administering the Lottery sports wagering program pursuant 12    to Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act.13        (3) On the last day of each month or as soon thereafter 14    as possible, the State Comptroller shall direct and the 15    State Treasurer shall transfer from the State Lottery Fund 16    to the Common School Fund the Department's estimate of net 17    lottery proceeds.18        (4) If an amount in excess of the annual net lottery 19    proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then the 20    Department shall offset the monthly transfers of estimated 21    net lottery proceeds during the following fiscal year by 22    that excess amount. If an amount less than the annual net 23    lottery proceeds is transferred for a fiscal year, then 24    after the related annual fiscal year audit is completed 25    following such fiscal year, the Department shall direct 26    the deposit of any remaining annual net lottery proceeds   SB1564- 3 -LRB104 08185 LNS 18235 b1    from such fiscal year, subject to payments under 2    paragraphs (1) and (2), into the Common School Fund as 3    soon thereafter as possible.4    (b) The net lottery proceeds shall be determined by 5deducting from total annual lottery proceeds the expenditures 6required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a). The 7total annual lottery proceeds and annual net lottery proceeds 8shall be determined according to generally accepted accounting 9principles for governmental entities and verified by an annual 10fiscal year audit.11(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 12    (20 ILCS 1605/20)  (from Ch. 120, par. 1170)13    Sec. 20. State Lottery Fund. 14    (a) There is created in the State Treasury a special fund 15to be known as the State Lottery Fund. Such fund shall consist 16of all revenues received from (1) the sale of lottery tickets 17or shares, (net of commissions, fees representing those 18expenses that are directly proportionate to the sale of 19tickets or shares at the agent location, and prizes of less 20than $600 which have been validly paid at the agent level), (2) 21application fees, and (3) all other sources including moneys 22credited or transferred thereto from any other fund or source 23pursuant to law. Interest earnings of the State Lottery Fund 24shall be credited to the Common School Fund.25    (a-5) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section   SB1564- 4 -LRB104 08185 LNS 18235 b121.4 of this Act shall be in accordance with Section 21.4. 2    (b) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 321.5 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.5. 4    (c) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 521.6 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.6.6    (d) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 721.7 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.7. 8    (e) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 921.8 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.8. 10    (f) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1121.9 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.9. 12    (g) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1321.10 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.10. 14    (h) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1521.11 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.11. 16    (i) (Blank). 17    (j) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 1821.13 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.13.19    (k) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2025-70 of the Sports Wagering Act shall be in accordance with 21Section 25-70 of the Sports Wagering Act. 22    (l) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2321.15 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.15. 24    (m) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section 2521.16 of this Law shall be in accordance with Section 21.16.26    (n) The receipt and distribution of moneys under Section   SB1564- 5 -LRB104 08185 LNS 18235 b121.18 of this Law shall be accordance with Section 21.18. 2(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 103-381, eff. 7-28-23.) 3    (20 ILCS 1605/21.18 new)4    Sec. 21.18. Scratch-off for developmental disabilities 5services. 6    (a) If a scratch-off game is discontinued pursuant to 7Section 21.4, then the Department shall offer a special 8instant scratch-off game for the benefit of the Illinois 9Developmental Disabilities Services Scratch-Off Fund for 10developmental disabilities services under the Independent 11Service Coordination agencies. The game shall commence as soon 12practical after the discontinuation, at the discretion of the 13Director, and shall operate for 5 years. The operation of the 14game shall be governed by this Law and any rules adopted by the 15Department.16    (b) The net revenue from the developmental disabilities 17services scratch-off game shall be deposited into the Illinois 18Developmental Disabilities Services Scratch-Off Fund. Moneys 19received for the purposes of this Section, including, without 20limitation, net revenue from the special instant scratch-off 21game and from gifts, grants, and awards from any public or 22private entity, must be deposited into the Fund. For the 23purposes of this subsection, "net revenue" means the total 24amount for which tickets have been sold less the sum of the 25amount paid out in the prizes and the actual administrative   SB1564- 6 -LRB104 08185 LNS 18235 b1expenses of the Department solely related to the scratch-off 2game under this Section.3    (c) During the time that tickets are sold for the 4developmental disabilities research, support, education, and 5awareness scratch-off game, the Department shall not 6unreasonably diminish the efforts devoted to marketing any 7other instant scratch-off lottery game.8    (d) The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 9implement and administer the provisions of this Section. 10    Section 15. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 11Section 5.1030 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)13    Sec. 5.1030. The Illinois Developmental Disabilities 14Services Scratch-Off Fund. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.